Rhode Island, session 2025, SB954.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3-5-20 of the General Laws in Chapter 3-5 entitled "Licenses
Generally" is hereby amended to read as follows:
3-5-20. Rules and regulations — Notice and procedure.
All licenses issued shall be in any form prescribed by the department of business regulation
and the license shall be held under any rules and regulations as the department shall impose,
establish, and authorize and the department is authorized to establish rules and regulations and to
authorize the making of any rules and regulations by the licensing authority of the several towns
and cities as in their discretions in the public interest seem proper to be made. Notwithstanding any
of the foregoing provisions of this section, the adoption or authorization of rules and regulations
by the department and the modification or repeal of any rules and regulations previously adopted
shall be by written order of the department and adopted in accordance with the provisions of chapter
35 of title 42.
SECTION 2. Chapter 3-5 of the General Laws entitled "Licenses Generally" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
3-5-30. SafeRIde program information -- License fees and violations -- Surcharges.
(a) The department shall prepare and provide an informational booklet to each licensee
licensed under this title which explains the rules and regulations governing the SafeRIde program
described in § 3-7-30 and the licensee’s participation in the SafeRIde program. Said booklet shall
be provided to all new licensees and upon license renewal following the effective date of this

section.
(b) All fees or fines paid for licenses or violations under this chapter shall be subject to a
surcharge equal to ten percent (10%) of the cost of the fee or fine, which shall be deposited into a
restricted fund for use by the department to fund the SafeRIde program.
SECTION 3. Chapter 3-6 of the General Laws entitled "Manufacturing and Wholesale
Licenses" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
3-6-19. License and certificate fees and violations -- Surcharges.
All fees or fines paid for licenses, certificates or violations under this section shall be
subject to a surcharge equal to ten percent (10%) of the cost of the fee or fine, which shall be
deposited into a restricted fund for use by the department to fund the SafeRIde program.
SECTION 4. Chapter 3-7 of the General Laws entitled "Retail Licenses" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following sections:
3-7-30. SafeRIde program.
(a) The primary legislative purpose of this section is to prevent intoxication-related injuries
and deaths, to reduce the prevalence of DUIs among Rhode Island’s population, and to encourage
all servers of alcohol to exercise responsible serving practices.
(b) The SafeRIde program will provide transportation, free of charge, to persons suspected
of having a prohibited alcohol concentration, as defined in § 31-27-2, from any premises licensed
under this chapter to sell alcoholic beverages to the person’s place of residence. Requests for
transportation through the SafeRIde program shall be made by the owner or employees of the
establishment furnishing alcoholic beverages.
(c) The department of business regulation, pursuant to its authority under § 3-5-20, shall
have full power and authority to promulgate rules and regulations to implement the SafeRIde
program.
(d) The SafeRIde program shall be funded pursuant to revenues collected via surcharges
on licenses and fines pursuant to this title, and pursuant to revenues collected via surcharges
assessed by the court for violations of § 31-27-2.
3-7-31. License fees and violations -- Surcharges.
All fees or fines paid for licenses and violations under this section shall be subject to a
surcharge equal to ten percent (10%) of the cost of the fee or fine, which shall be deposited into a
restricted fund for use by the department to fund the SafeRIde program.
SECTION 5. Section 31-27-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-27 entitled "Motor
Vehicle Offenses" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-27-2. Driving under influence of liquor or drugs. [Effective July 1, 2025.]
LC002204 - Page 2 of 12

(a) Whoever drives or otherwise operates any vehicle in the state while under the influence
of any intoxicating liquor, drugs, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of
title 21, or any combination of these, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, except as provided in
subsection (d)(3), and shall be punished as provided in subsection (d) of this section.
(b)(1) Any person charged under subsection (a), whose blood alcohol concentration is eight
one-hundredths of one percent (.08%) or more by weight, as shown by a chemical analysis of a
blood, breath, or urine sample, shall be guilty of violating subsection (a). This provision shall not
preclude a conviction based on other admissible evidence, including the testimony of a drug
recognition expert or evaluator, certified pursuant to training approved by the Rhode Island
department of transportation office on highway safety. Proof of guilt under this section may also
be based on evidence that the person charged was under the influence of intoxicating liquor, drugs,
toluene, or any controlled substance defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or any combination of these,
to a degree that rendered the person incapable of safely operating a vehicle. The fact that any person
charged with violating this section is, or has been, legally entitled to use alcohol or a drug shall not
constitute a defense against any charge of violating this section.
(2) [Deleted by P.L. 2021, ch. 170, § 1 and P.L. 2021, ch. 171, § 1.]
(c) In any criminal prosecution for a violation of subsection (a), evidence as to the amount
of intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or
any combination of these, in the defendant’s blood at the time alleged as shown by a chemical
analysis of the defendant’s breath, blood, saliva or urine or other bodily substance, shall be
admissible and competent, provided that evidence is presented that the following conditions have
been complied with:
(1) The defendant has consented to the taking of the test upon which the analysis is made.
Evidence that the defendant had refused to submit to the test shall not be admissible unless the
defendant elects to testify.
(2) A true copy of the report of the test result was hand delivered at the location of the test
or mailed within seventy-two (72) hours of the taking of the test to the person submitting to a breath
test.
(3) Any person submitting to a chemical test of blood, urine, saliva or other body fluids
shall have a true copy of the report of the test result mailed to him or her within thirty (30) days
following the taking of the test.
(4) The test was performed according to methods and with equipment approved by the
director of the department of health of the state of Rhode Island and by an authorized individual.
(5) Equipment used for the conduct of the tests by means of breath analysis had been tested
LC002204 - Page 3 of 12

for accuracy within thirty (30) days preceding the test by personnel qualified as hereinbefore
provided, and breathalyzer operators shall be qualified and certified by the department of health
within three hundred sixty-five (365) days of the test.
(6) The person arrested and charged with operating a motor vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of
title 21 or any combination of these in violation of subsection (a), was afforded the opportunity to
have an additional chemical test. The officer arresting or so charging the person shall have informed
the person of this right and afforded him or her a reasonable opportunity to exercise this right, and
a notation to this effect is made in the official records of the case in the police department. Refusal
to permit an additional chemical test shall render incompetent and inadmissible in evidence the
original report.
(d)(1)(i) Every person found to have violated subsection (b)(1) shall be sentenced as
follows: for a first violation whose blood alcohol concentration is eight one-hundredths of one
percent (.08%), but less than one-tenth of one percent (.1%), by weight, or who has a blood presence
of any scheduled controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, shall be subject to a fine
of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor more than three hundred dollars ($300); shall be
required to perform ten (10) to sixty (60) hours of public community restitution, and/or shall be
imprisoned for up to one year. The sentence may be served in any unit of the adult correctional
institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge and/or shall be required to attend a special
course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance; provided,
however, that the court may permit a servicemember or veteran to complete any court-approved
counseling program administered or approved by the Veterans’ Administration, and his or her
driver’s license shall be suspended for thirty (30) days up to one hundred eighty (180) days. The
sentencing judge or magistrate may prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle, pursuant
to subsection (d)(9) or (d)(10) of this section, that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system
and/or blood and urine testing as provided in § 31-27-2.8.
(ii) Every person convicted of a first violation whose blood alcohol concentration is one-
tenth of one percent (.1%) by weight or above, but less than fifteen hundredths of one percent
(.15%), or whose blood alcohol concentration is unknown, shall be subject to a fine of not less than
one hundred ($100) dollars, nor more than four hundred dollars ($400), and shall be required to
perform ten (10) to sixty (60) hours of public community restitution and/or shall be imprisoned for
up to one year. The sentence may be served in any unit of the adult correctional institutions in the
discretion of the sentencing judge. The person’s driving license shall be suspended for a period of
three (3) months to twelve (12) months. The sentencing judge shall require attendance at a special
LC002204 - Page 4 of 12

course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance and/or
alcoholic or drug treatment for the individual; provided, however, that the court may permit a
servicemember or veteran to complete any court-approved counseling program administered or
approved by the Veterans’ Administration. The sentencing judge or magistrate may prohibit that
person from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system as
provided in § 31-27-2.8.
(iii) Every person convicted of a first offense whose blood alcohol concentration is fifteen
hundredths of one percent (.15%) or above, or who is under the influence of a drug, toluene, or any
controlled substance as defined in subsection (b)(1), shall be subject to a fine of five hundred dollars
($500) and shall be required to perform twenty (20) to sixty (60) hours of public community
restitution and/or shall be imprisoned for up to one year. The sentence may be served in any unit
of the adult correctional institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge. The person’s driving
license shall be suspended for a period of three (3) months to eighteen (18) months. The sentencing
judge shall require attendance at a special course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence
of a controlled substance and/or alcohol or drug treatment for the individual; provided, however,
that the court may permit a servicemember or veteran to complete any court-approved counseling
program administered or approved by the Veterans’ Administration. The sentencing judge or
magistrate shall prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle, pursuant to subsection (d)(9)
or (d)(10) of this section, that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system and/or blood and
urine testing as provided in § 31-27-2.8.
(2)(i) Every person convicted of a second violation within a ten-year (10) period with a
blood alcohol concentration of eight one-hundredths of one percent (.08%) or above, but less than
fifteen hundredths of one percent (.15%), or whose blood alcohol concentration is unknown, or
who has a blood presence of any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, and every
person convicted of a second violation within a ten-year (10) period, regardless of whether the prior
violation and subsequent conviction was a violation and subsequent conviction under this statute
or under the driving under the influence of liquor or drugs statute of any other state, shall be subject
to a mandatory fine of four hundred dollars ($400). The person’s driving license shall be suspended
for a period of one year to two (2) years, and the individual shall be sentenced to not less than ten
(10) days, nor more than one year, in jail. The sentence may be served in any unit of the adult
correctional institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge; however, not less than forty-eight
(48) hours of imprisonment shall be served consecutively. The sentencing judge shall require
alcohol or drug treatment for the individual; provided, however, that the court may permit a
servicemember or veteran to complete any court-approved counseling program administered or
LC002204 - Page 5 of 12

approved by the Veterans’ Administration and shall prohibit that person from operating a motor
vehicle, pursuant to subsection (d)(9) or (d)(10) of this section, that is not equipped with an ignition
interlock system and/or blood and urine testing as provided in § 31-27-2.8.
(ii) Every person convicted of a second violation within a ten-year (10) period whose blood
alcohol concentration is fifteen hundredths of one percent (.15%) or above, by weight as shown by
a chemical analysis of a blood, breath, or urine sample, or who is under the influence of a drug,
toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in subsection (b)(1), shall be subject to mandatory
imprisonment of not less than six (6) months, nor more than one year; a mandatory fine of not less
than one thousand dollars ($1,000); and a mandatory license suspension for a period of two (2)
years from the date of completion of the sentence imposed under this subsection. The sentencing
judge shall require alcohol or drug treatment for the individual; provided, however, that the court
may permit a servicemember or veteran to complete any court approved counseling program
administered or approved by the Veterans’ Administration. The sentencing judge or magistrate
shall prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle, pursuant to subsection (d)(9) or (d)(10)
of this section, that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing
as provided in § 31-27-2.8.
(3)(i) Every person convicted of a third or subsequent violation within a ten-year (10)
period with a blood alcohol concentration of eight one-hundredths of one percent (.08%) or above,
but less than fifteen hundredths of one percent (.15%), or whose blood alcohol concentration is
unknown or who has a blood presence of any scheduled controlled substance as defined in chapter
28 of title 21, regardless of whether any prior violation and subsequent conviction was a violation
and subsequent conviction under this statute or under the driving under the influence of liquor or
drugs statute of any other state, shall be guilty of a felony and be subject to a mandatory fine of
four hundred ($400) dollars. The person’s driving license shall be suspended for a period of two
(2) years to three (3) years, and the individual shall be sentenced to not less than one year and not
more than three (3) years in jail. The sentence may be served in any unit of the adult correctional
institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge; however, not less than forty-eight (48) hours
of imprisonment shall be served consecutively. The sentencing judge shall require alcohol or drug
treatment for the individual; provided, however, that the court may permit a servicemember or
veteran to complete any court-approved counseling program administered or approved by the
Veterans’ Administration, and shall prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle, pursuant
to subsection (d)(9) or (d)(10) of this section, that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system
and/or blood and urine testing as provided in § 31-27-2.8.
(ii) Every person convicted of a third or subsequent violation within a ten-year (10) period
LC002204 - Page 6 of 12

whose blood alcohol concentration is fifteen hundredths of one percent (.15%) above by weight as
shown by a chemical analysis of a blood, breath, or urine sample, or who is under the influence of
a drug, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in subsection (b)(1), shall be subject to
mandatory imprisonment of not less than three (3) years, nor more than five (5) years; a mandatory
fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000);
and a mandatory license suspension for a period of three (3) years from the date of completion of
the sentence imposed under this subsection. The sentencing judge shall require alcohol or drug
treatment for the individual. The sentencing judge or magistrate shall prohibit that person from
operating a motor vehicle, pursuant to subsection (d)(9) or (d)(10) of this section, that is not
equipped with an ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing as provided in § 31-27-
2.8.
(iii) In addition to the foregoing penalties, every person convicted of a third or subsequent
violation within a ten-year (10) period, regardless of whether any prior violation and subsequent
conviction was a violation and subsequent conviction under this statute or under the driving under
the influence of liquor or drugs statute of any other state, shall be subject, in the discretion of the
sentencing judge, to having the vehicle owned and operated by the violator seized and sold by the
state of Rhode Island, with all funds obtained by the sale to be transferred to the general fund.
(4) Whoever drives or otherwise operates any vehicle in the state while under the influence
of any intoxicating liquor, drugs, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of
title 21, or any combination of these, when his or her license to operate is suspended, revoked, or
cancelled for operating under the influence of a narcotic drug or intoxicating liquor, shall be guilty
of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years and by a fine of not more
than three thousand dollars ($3,000). The court shall require alcohol and/or drug treatment for the
individual; provided, the penalties provided for in this subsection (d)(4) shall not apply to an
individual who has surrendered his or her license and served the court-ordered period of suspension,
but who, for any reason, has not had his or her license reinstated after the period of suspension,
revocation, or suspension has expired; provided, further, the individual shall be subject to the
provisions of subsection (d)(2)(i), (d)(2)(ii), (d)(3)(i), (d)(3)(ii), or (d)(3)(iii) regarding subsequent
offenses, and any other applicable provision of this section.
(5)(i) For purposes of determining the period of license suspension, a prior violation shall
constitute any charge brought and sustained under the provisions of this section or § 31-27-2.1.
(ii) Any person over the age of eighteen (18) who is convicted under this section for
operating a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, other drugs, or a combination of
these, while a child under the age of thirteen (13) years was present as a passenger in the motor
LC002204 - Page 7 of 12

vehicle when the offense was committed shall be subject to immediate license suspension pending
prosecution. Any person convicted of violating this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor for a
first offense and may be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not more than one year and a fine
not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000). Any person convicted of a second or subsequent
offense shall be guilty of a felony offense and may be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not
more than five (5) years and a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). The sentencing
judge shall also order a license suspension of up to two (2) years, require attendance at a special
course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance, and alcohol
or drug education and/or treatment. The individual may also be required to pay a highway
assessment fee of no more than five hundred dollars ($500) and the assessment shall be deposited
in the general fund.
(6)(i) Any person convicted of a violation under this section shall pay a highway
assessment fine of five hundred dollars ($500) that shall be deposited into the general fund. The
assessment provided for by this subsection shall be collected from a violator before any other fines
authorized by this section.
(ii) Any person convicted of a violation under this section shall be assessed a fee of eighty-
six dollars ($86).
(7)(i) If the person convicted of violating this section is under the age of eighteen (18)
years, for the first violation he or she shall be required to perform ten (10) to sixty (60) hours of
public community restitution and the juvenile’s driving license shall be suspended for a period of
six (6) months, and may be suspended for a period up to eighteen (18) months. The sentencing
judge shall also require attendance at a special course on driving while intoxicated or under the
influence of a controlled substance and alcohol or drug education and/or treatment for the juvenile.
The juvenile may also be required to pay a highway assessment fine of no more than five hundred
dollars ($500) and the assessment imposed shall be deposited into the general fund.
(ii) If the person convicted of violating this section is under the age of eighteen (18) years,
for a second or subsequent violation regardless of whether any prior violation and subsequent
conviction was a violation and subsequent conviction under this statute or under the driving under
the influence of liquor or drugs statute of any other state, he or she shall be subject to a mandatory
suspension of his or her driving license until such time as he or she is twenty-one (21) years of age
and may, in the discretion of the sentencing judge, also be sentenced to the Rhode Island training
school for a period of not more than one year and/or a fine of not more than five hundred dollars
($500).
(8) Any person convicted of a violation under this section may undergo a clinical
LC002204 - Page 8 of 12

assessment at the community college of Rhode Island’s center for workforce and community
education. Should this clinical assessment determine problems of alcohol, drug abuse, or
psychological problems associated with alcoholic or drug abuse, this person shall be referred to an
appropriate facility, licensed or approved by the department of behavioral healthcare,
developmental disabilities and hospitals, for treatment placement, case management, and
monitoring. In the case of a servicemember or veteran, the court may order that the person be
evaluated through the Veterans’ Administration. Should the clinical assessment determine
problems of alcohol, drug abuse, or psychological problems associated with alcohol or drug abuse,
the person may have their treatment, case management, and monitoring administered or approved
by the Veterans’ Administration.
(9) Notwithstanding any other sentencing and disposition provisions contained in this
chapter, if the judge or magistrate makes a finding beyond a reasonable doubt that a motorist was
operating a vehicle in the state while under the influence of drugs, toluene, or any controlled
substance as evidenced by the presence of controlled substances on or about the person or vehicle,
or other reliable indicia or articulable conditions thereof, but not intoxicating liquor based on a
preliminary breath test, results from a breathalyzer that indicates no blood alcohol concentration,
or both, the judge or magistrate may exercise his or her discretion and eliminate the requirement of
an ignition interlock system; provided, that blood and/or urine testing is mandated as a condition
to operating a motor vehicle as provided in § 31-27-2.8.
(10) Notwithstanding any other sentencing and disposition provisions contained in this
chapter, if the judge or magistrate makes a finding beyond a reasonable doubt that a motorist was
operating a vehicle in the state while under the influence of drugs, toluene, or any controlled
substance as evidenced by the presence of controlled substances on or about the person or vehicle,
or other reliable indicia or articulable conditions thereof and intoxicating liquor based on a
preliminary breath test, results from a breathalyzer that indicates blood alcohol concentration, or
both, the judge or magistrate may require an ignition interlock system in addition to blood and/or
urine testing as a condition to operating a motor vehicle as provided in § 31-27-2.8.
(e) Percent by weight of alcohol in the blood shall be based upon milligrams of alcohol per
one hundred cubic centimeters (100 cc) of blood.
(f)(1) There is established an alcohol and drug safety unit within the division of motor
vehicles to administer an alcohol safety action program. The program shall provide for placement
and follow-up for persons who are required to pay the highway safety assessment. The alcohol and
drug safety action program will be administered in conjunction with alcohol and drug programs
licensed by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.
LC002204 - Page 9 of 12

(2) Persons convicted under the provisions of this chapter shall be required to attend a
special course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance, and/or
participate in an alcohol or drug treatment program, which course and programs must meet the
standards established by the Rhode Island department of behavioral healthcare, developmental
disabilities and hospitals; provided, however, that the court may permit a servicemember or veteran
to complete any court-approved counseling program administered or approved by the Veterans’
Administration. The course shall take into consideration any language barrier that may exist as to
any person ordered to attend, and shall provide for instruction reasonably calculated to
communicate the purposes of the course in accordance with the requirements of the subsection.
Any costs reasonably incurred in connection with the provision of this accommodation shall be
borne by the person being retrained. A copy of any violation under this section shall be forwarded
by the court to the alcohol and drug safety unit. In the event that persons convicted under the
provisions of this chapter fail to attend and complete the above course or treatment program, as
ordered by the judge, then the person may be brought before the court, and after a hearing as to
why the order of the court was not followed, may be sentenced to jail for a period not exceeding
one year.
(3) The alcohol and drug safety action program within the division of motor vehicles shall
be funded by general revenue appropriations.
(g) The director of the department of health is empowered to make and file with the
secretary of state regulations that prescribe the techniques and methods of chemical analysis of the
person’s body fluids or breath and the qualifications and certification of individuals authorized to
administer this testing and analysis.
(h) Jurisdiction for misdemeanor violations of this section shall be with the district court
for persons eighteen (18) years of age or older and to the family court for persons under the age of
eighteen (18) years. The courts shall have full authority to impose any sentence authorized and to
order the suspension of any license for violations of this section. Trials in superior court are not
required to be scheduled within thirty (30) days of the arraignment date.
(i) No fines, suspensions, assessments, alcohol or drug treatment programs, course on
driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance, public community
restitution, or jail provided for under this section can be suspended.
(j) An order to attend a special course on driving while intoxicated, that shall be
administered in cooperation with a college or university accredited by the state, shall include a
provision to pay a reasonable tuition for the course in an amount not less than twenty-five dollars
($25.00), and a fee of one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175), which fee shall be deposited into
LC002204 - Page 10 of 12

the general fund.
(k) For the purposes of this section, any test of a sample of blood, breath, or urine for the
presence of alcohol that relies in whole or in part upon the principle of infrared light absorption is
considered a chemical test.
(l) If any provision of this section, or the application of any provision, shall for any reason
be judged invalid, such a judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of the
section, but shall be confined in this effect to the provision or application directly involved in the
controversy giving rise to the judgment.
(m) For the purposes of this section, “servicemember” means a person who is presently
serving in the armed forces of the United States, including the Coast Guard, a reserve component
thereof, or the National Guard. “Veteran” means a person who has served in the armed forces,
including the Coast Guard of the United States, a reserve component thereof, or the National Guard,
and has been discharged under other than dishonorable conditions.
(n) In addition to any and all fines or costs for a violation pursuant to this section, the court
shall charge a surcharge of fifty dollars ($50.00) per violation to fund the SafeRIde program.
SECTION 6. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
========
LC002204
========
LC002204 - Page 11 of 12